Tennessee, session 114, HB1839.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 41, Chapter 22, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, if an inmate is housed in a local jail
and the inmate is participating in a work release or re-entry program, then the
department of correction shall not remove the inmate from the local jail facility for the
purpose of relocating the inmate to a state facility unless the inmate has failed to meet
the work release or in-house duty requirements or the inmate's disciplinary records
warrant the inmate's removal from participation in the work release or re-entry program.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1839
009988
- 1 -